Idaho, session 2026, S1427.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Lands the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $160,000 $145,000 $305,000
Navigable Waterways
Fund $147,200 147,200
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 0 640,900 0 640,900
TOTAL $147,200 $800,900 $145,000 $1,093,100
II. FOREST RESOURCES MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $5,000 $5,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund $725,800 $725,800
IV. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General
Fund $140,300 $140,300
Department of Lands
Fund 0 $600,000 600,000
TOTAL $140,300 $600,000 $740,300
V. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
Navigable Waterways
Fund $160,000 $160,000
GRAND TOTAL $447,500 $2,131,700 $145,000 $2,724,200
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Lands is hereby reduced by the
following amounts according to the designated programs from personnel costs
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
I. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
Endowment Earnings Administrative Fund $147,200
II. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
Department of Lands Fund $160,000
GRAND TOTAL $307,200
SECTION 3. IDAHO GEOLOGICAL SURVEY. Of the moneys appropriated in Sec-
tion 1 of this act from the Department of Lands Fund, $145,000 shall be dis-
tributed by the Department of Lands to the Idaho Geological Survey.


SECTION 4. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Forest
and Range Fire Protection Program is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Forest and Range Fire Protection Program from other programs within the De-
partment of Lands for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. LIMITATIONS FOR GENERAL FUND BONUSES. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, the use of General Fund appropria-
tions for bonuses shall be limited to firefighters with an incident qualifi-
cation card including an operational qualification. The Department of Lands
shall provide a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office on
the award of bonuses for the 2026 fire season. The report shall be submitted
no later than January 5, 2027.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 297, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Lands the following amounts accord-
ing to the designated programs to be expended for personnel costs from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
I. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General Fund $124,900
II. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
Navigable Waterways Fund $160,000
GRAND TOTAL $284,900
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Lands for the Minerals, Public
Trust, Oil and Gas Program in Section 1, Chapter 297, Laws of 2025, from the
Department of Lands Fund is hereby reduced by $160,000 for personnel costs
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 9. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Forest
and Range Fire Protection Program is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Forest and Range Fire Protection Program from other programs within the De-
partment of Lands for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.


SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 7, 8, and 9 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.